src/fst/stems/arabic_roman_digits.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2020 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Arabic numerals
!  ------------------

!! Arabic numeral expressions can be classified in at least the following categories:
!! ; general numeric expressions: 123 456,789 - note: space as thousand separator, groups of three digits
!! ; accounting numeric expressions: 123.456,789 - note: full stop as thousands separator, groups of three digits
!! ; numeric range expressions: 12-14 - can be dates, times, lengths, masses and other sorts of measurements
!! ; measurements: 123 kg
!! ; dates: 2.4.1999, 4.5., 7.8.02, 04.10.2016
!! ; times: 12:34
!! ; money amounts: kr 1234,56; 6.990,-
!! ; temperature: –8°C, 256°K, 100°F

!! The categories we have are:
!! * arabic
!! * roman
!!
!! Each of these can be subdivided:
!!
!! !!Roman
!! * dates
!! * general (covers years, pagination, lists, and most other uses) - should
!!   yeares get a category of its own? so that roman numbers below 100 are
!!   anything, whereas above we consider them years?
!!
!! !!Arabic
!!
!! * years (four digits in the range 1000-2500?)
!! ** [[Fransa riegádii] 1182:s [[Umbrias Italias.]
!! ** [[almmuhii čakčat] 2009 [[iežas dutkosa]
!! * dates in various formats (we should recognise them all, and tag them):
!! ** borgemánu 31. beaivvi.
!! ** 31.1.
!! ** 31.1.2018
!! * time (in all different formats, tagged)
!! ** 11.00
!! * phone numbers (ideally all international formats, but at least all the nordic ones)
!! ** 018-16 96 00 (Swedish)
!! ** 23081200 (Norwegian)
!! * general, in three different versions: space separated with comma decimal,
!!   punct separated wwith comma decimal, and punct separated with full stop decimal
!! * temperatures - subtype  of general?
!! * fractions (nordic style): **0,99**
!! * plain digits, possibly with thousand separators:
!! ** 7 (miljovnna)
!! ** 16 (jagi)
!! ** (leat sullii) 25 000 (bargi,)
!! * listings:
!! ** 1) some text, 2) another text, etc
!! ** 1. some text, 1.0 some text, 1.1 some text, etc
!! * postal codes, format varies by country - should they be kept in language-specific lexicons?
!! ** 751 70 (Uppsala)
!! ** 0002 [[Oslo]
!! ** 00100 [[Helsingfors]
!! ** N-0106 [[Oslo] - should country codes be encoded, or handled via compounding?
!! * biblical verses, sometimes mistyped using space or comma (or both) instead of colon
!!   between book and verse (do we want to detect and correct these?); NB! - note similarity with times!:
!! ** [[Kor] 5:17
!! ** [[Gal.] 3:27–28
!! ** [[Lukas] 1, 26-38.
!! ** [[Joh.] 13:34
!! ** [[Matt] 28: 18–20
!! ** [[Apg] 2:38
!! ** [[Mos] 1:27–28a
!! ** [[Sál] 103, 13–17
!! ** [[Sál] 139, 1–12.23–24
!! ** [[Joh] 10,14:28–29
!! ** [[Kor] 15,53–57
!! * text section references:
!! ** [[SvPS] 697:2,
!!
!! All of the above can be both simple values or ranges:@
!! * 2007-2008 (year)
!! * [[Gal.] 3:27–28; [[Lukas] 1, 26-38. (biblical verse)
!! * 0-18 [[jagi.] (age, but really a plain integer range in front of a qualifying noun)
!!
!! Some but not all of the above can make compounds in compounding languages
!! (obviously compounding and other morphology has to be covered in the
!! language specific continuation lexicons):
!! * 1800-logu (year)
!!
!! Some but not all of the above can inflect for case in such languages
!! (obviously case inflection and other morphology has to be covered in the
!! language specific continuation lexicons):
!! * 1978:s (year)
!! (Hornberger 1989: 289) - should be analysed as a regular year, not including the colon; this works fine using hfst-tokenise.
!!
!! We do NOT include measurements, instead  we analyse the measurement abbreviation separately after a general num analysis.
!!
!! Currency prefixes should be treated as a segment of its own, and not as part of the number. We still to consider prefixes written together with the following number, ie without space.
!!
!! We do not tag anything in this file, instead we just give continuation lexicons for all different types, so that both tags and possible inflections can be handled on a per language basis. The template file will give suggested tags acccording to the GiellaLT style.

!! And for sure more than these. Previously everything has been more or less
!! lumped together, but to avoid noise and to get better input for grammar
!! checking the ARABICS section should be rewritten such that each category
!! gets its own lexicon. That way it is easier to restrict the syntax of
!! numerical expressions in each category.


LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES   !!≈ !! __@CODE@__
                       !!  This lexicon contains a number of letters and other
                       !!  symbols found in front of digits. Their continuation
                       !!  lexicons should probably be changed as we restructure
                       !!  the arabic numerals.
    §:§      ARABIC ; ! §24
   §§:§§     ARABIC ; ! §§24
  §% :§%     ARABIC ; ! § 24
 §§% :§§%    ARABIC ; ! §§ 24
   %-:∑-     ARABIC ; ! -24
   %‒:%‒     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2012
   %–:%–     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2013
   %—:%—     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2014
   %―:%―     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2015
   %+:%+     ARABIC ; ! <plus>24
 %-% :∑-%    ARABIC ; ! - 24
 %‒% :%‒%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2012
 %–% :%–%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2013
 %—% :%—%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2014
 %―% :%―%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2015
 %+% :%+%    ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24
   %*:%*     ARABIC ; ! *24
   %$:%$     ARABIC ; ! $24
   %€:%€     ARABIC ; ! €24
   %<:%[%<%] ARABIC ; ! <24
   %>:%[%>%] ARABIC ; ! >24
  s%.:s%.    ARABIC ; ! s.24
             ARABICX ; ! 3x4+Num+Err/Missingspace (should be 3 x 4)

LEXICON ARABICS
            +Use/Circ: REALARABICfirst  ; ! for the arabic numerals
            +Use/Circ: REALARABICpunct  ; ! for the arabic numerals
                       ARABIC           ; ! for +Sem/ID
                       ARABICDATE       ; ! for +Sem/Date
                       ARABICYEAR       ; ! for +Sem/Year
                       ARABICCLOCK      ; ! for +Sem/Time-clock
                       ARABICORD        ; ! for +Ord
!                       ARABIC-COLL      ;
       ARABICX          ; ! for 3x4 and its like

LEXICON REALARABICfirst !!≈ * __@CODE@__ to avoid 0 as first arabic, except from only 0, or in front of comma
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > REALARABIC          ; ! 2-4 digits
< [1 "@P.number.one@"|2 "@P.number.two@"|3 "@P.number.three@"|4 "@P.number.four@"|5 "@P.number.five@"|6 "@P.number.six@"|7 "@P.number.seven@"|8 "@P.number.eight@"|9 "@P.number.nine@"|%0  "@P.number.ten@"]  > REALARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 digit only
                  %0    ARABICDELIMITER     ; ! 0 is a number
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > REALARABICfirstpart ; !first arabic in numbers like 199 878 and 199.878 (no 0)
                  %0    REALARABICDELIMITER ; ! 0, and 0-
                  %0    REALDECARABICdec    ; ! 0,5 and 0-5 %

LEXICON REALARABICpunct !!≈ * __@CODE@__ to get number after
   %-:∑-     REALARABICfirst ; ! -24
   %‒:%‒     REALARABICfirst ; ! -24 U+2012
   %–:%–     REALARABICfirst ; ! -24 U+2013
   %—:%—     REALARABICfirst ; ! -24 U+2014
   %―:%―     REALARABICfirst ; ! -24 U+2015
   %+:%+     REALARABICfirst ; ! <plus>24

LEXICON REALARABIC   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 1-4 arabics
< (1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0) (1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0) [1 "@P.number.one@"|2 "@P.number.two@"|3 "@P.number.three@"|4 "@P.number.four@"|5 "@P.number.five@"|6 "@P.number.six@"|7 "@P.number.seven@"|8 "@P.number.eight@"|9 "@P.number.nine@"|%0  "@P.number.ten@"]  > REALARABICDELIMITER ; ! hyph, %, casesuffix

LEXICON REALARABICfirstpart !!≈ * __@CODE@__ numbers like 199 878, 199.878, 199,878, 12000-13000
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0|0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0|0]  > REALARABICsecondpart ; ! 199 878 and 199.878
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0|0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0|0]  > REALDECARABICsecond ; ! 19912,878 and 12000-13000



LEXICON REALDECARABICsecond !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 19912,878 and 12000-13000
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] >  REALDECARABICsecond ;  ! loop
 REALDECARABICdec ; ! comma and hyph


LEXICON REALDECARABICdec  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hyph and comma
%,  REALARABICDECIM ;
!%,@P.ErrOrth.ON@:%.@P.ErrOrth.ON@  REALARABICDECIM ; ! 0.6 pro correct 0,6 Kommenterte denne ut, det trenges ekstra tagg og disambiguering hvis denne skal brukes, kombinert med begrensening for høyre side av skilletegn. Denne generer Err/Orth til tall som 20.005 . Både 20.005 og 20,005 kan være korrekt.
%-:∑-  REALARABICDECIM ;
%-:∑-  REALARABICDECIM ;

LEXICON REALARABICsecondpart   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ numbers like 199 878 and 199.878
                               !! allow 199,878 as special typo
               < [% |%.] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > REALARABICsecondpart_cont ;
 < [%,] "@P.ErrOrth.ON@" [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > REALARABICsecondpart_cont ;

LEXICON REALARABICsecondpart_cont !!≈ * __@CODE@__ loop, to case suffix, to , or -,
  REALARABICDELIMITER  ;
  REALARABICsecondpart ;
  REALDECARABICdec     ;


LEXICON REALARABICDECIM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ loop and to % and case suffix
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > REALARABICDECIM ; !loop
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > PROSENT ; ! to %
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > DECIMALCASES ; ! to case suffix
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %+Use%/GC:0 >        MEASUREMENTS     ; ! gc needs measurements after arabic loops


LEXICON ARABIC   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Sem/ID, +Ord
< [1 "@P.number.one@"|2 "@P.number.two@"|3 "@P.number.three@"|4 "@P.number.four@"|5 "@P.number.five@"|6 "@P.number.six@"|7 "@P.number.seven@"|8 "@P.number.eight@"|9 "@P.number.nine@"|%0  "@P.number.ten@"]  > ARABICLOOPS ; ! hyph, %, casesuffix


LEXICON ARABICLOOPS !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                    ARABICLOOP      ;
!                    ARABICLOOPCOLL  ;
  +Use/SpellNoSugg: ARABICSabcdef   ;
!                   ARABICLOOPORD   ; !vi begrenser til tall opp til 100
!                   ARABICLOOPphone ; !denne overgenerer


LEXICON ARABICSabcdef !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < [a|b|c|d|e|f|f %  f] > ACASETAG ;


LEXICON ARABICDATE !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                                    ARABICDATENUM ;
< (1|2|%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9   ] > ARABICDATEHYPH ; ! 17.-...
< [1|2]                       %0  > ARABICDATEHYPH ; ! 20.-...
< [3]      [1|                %0] > ARABICDATEHYPH ; ! 31.-...
< (1|2|%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9   ] > ARABICDATENUM1 ; ! 17.3.-...
< [1|2]                       %0  > ARABICDATENUM1 ; ! 20.4.-...
< [3]      [1|                %0] > ARABICDATENUM1 ; ! 31.11.-...

LEXICON ARABICDATENUM1
 < %. ([1|%0]) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICDATEHYPH ; ! 29.09.-...
